Washington statutes.
RCW 33.20.180

Classification of depositors—Regulation of earnings according to class.

An association may classify its depositors according to the character, amount, frequency or duration of their dealings with the association and may regulate the earnings in such manner that each depositor receives the same rate of interest as all others of the depositor's class.

[ 1982 c 3 s 42; 1969 c 107 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.